Nevada, session 83, AB558.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to restore the balance in the Stale Claims Account created by
NRS 353.097 the sum of $4,616,752.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to restore the balance in the Emergency Account created by
NRS 353.263 the sum of $17,000.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to restore the balance in the Contingency Account created by
NRS 353.266 the sum of $25,730,726.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)